test/src/gt-desc-yamls/verbDES_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Verbs that have a subform.

Tests:
  Verb - luohtedit: # JÅRGESTIT_IV, Err/Orth
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Inf: luohtedit
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Inf: luohttedit
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Sup: luohtedittjat
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Sup: luohttedittjat
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ger: luohtedattijn
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ger: luohttedattijn
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+PrfPrc: luohtedam
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+PrfPrc: luohttedam
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ess: [luohtedime, luohtedimen]
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ess: [luohttedime, luohttedimen]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ela: luohtedimes
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ela: luohttedimes
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+VAbess: luohtedik
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+VAbess: luohttedik
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luohtedav
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luohttedav
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg2: luohteda
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg2: luohtteda
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luohtet
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luohttet
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luohtet
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luohttet
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du1: luohtedin
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du1: luohttedin
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du2: luohtedihppe
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du2: luohttedihppe
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du3: luohtedibá
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du3: luohttedibá
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Pl1: luohtedip
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Pl1: luohttedip
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Pl2: luohtedihpit
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Pl2: luohttedihpit
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Pl3: luohtedi
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Pl3: luohttedi
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg1: luohtediv
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg1: luohttediv
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg2: luohtedi
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg2: luohttedi
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luohtedij
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luohttedij
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du1: luohtedijma 
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du1+Err/Orth: luohtedijme
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du1: luohttedijma
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du1+Err/Orth: luohttedijme
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du2: luohtedijda
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du2+Err/Orth: luohtedijde
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du2: luohttedijda
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du2+Err/Orth: luohttedijde
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du3: luohtedijga
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du3: luohttedijga
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Pl1: luohtedijma
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Err/Orth: luohtedijme
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Pl1: luohttedijma
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Err/Orth: luohttedijme
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Pl2: luohtedijda
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Pl2+Err/Orth: luohtedijde
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Pl2: luohttedijda
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Pl2+Err/Orth: luohttedijde
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Pl3: luohtedin
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Pl3: luohttedin
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Sg2: luohteda
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Sg2: luohtteda
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Sg3: luohtedis
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Sg3: luohttedis
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Du1: luohtedinno
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Du1: luohttedinno
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Du2: luohtedihtte
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Du2: luohttedihtte
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Du3: luohtediska
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Du3: luohttediska
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl1: luohtedup
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl1: luohttedup
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl2: luohteduhtut
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl2: luohtteduhtut
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl3: luohttedusá
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl3: luohttedusá
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Sg1: luohtedittjav
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Sg1: luohttedittjav
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Sg2: luohtedittja
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Sg2: luohttedittja
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Sg3: luohtedisj
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Sg3: luohttedisj
    luohtedit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl3: luohtedittji
    luohtedit+V+Err/Orth+IV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl3: luohttedittji
  
  Verb - etterisolierit: # ABBONERE_TV, Err/Lex
    etterisolierit+V+Err/Lex+TV+Inf: [etterisolierit, etterisolerit]
    etterisolierit+V+Err/Lex+TV+PrfPrc: [etterisolierim, etterisolerim]
    etterisolierit+V+Err/Lex+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [etterisolieriv, etterisoleriv]
    etterisolierit+V+Err/Lex+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [etterisolieri, etterisoleri]
    etterisolierit+V+Err/Lex+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [etterisolierijga, etterisolerijga]
    etterisolierit+V+Err/Lex+TV+Pot+Sg3: [etterisolierisj, etterisolerisj]
    
  Verb - liehket: # LIEHKET, 
    liehket+V+IV+Inf: liehket
    liehket+V+IV+PrfPrc: [læhkám, lähkám]
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lav
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: la
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: lijga
    liehket+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: lisj
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1+SentInit: lev
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1+SentInit+Err/Orth: [læv, läv]
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2+SentInit: le
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2+SentInit+Err/Orth: [læ, lä]
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2+SentInit: [læhppe, lähppe]
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1+SentInit: lejma
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1+SentInit+Err/Orth: lejme
    liehket+V+IV+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [illa, ille]
    liehket+V+IV+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Err/Orth: [illæ, illä]
